Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.192

Former prisoner of war license plates.

"Former prisoner of war license plates" means special license plates that may be issued to former prisoners of war as authorized under RCW 46.18.235.

[ 2010 c 161 s 117.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.